Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 16.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201477-27,100
Income tax;
claim for refund; limitation.

The action authorized
in section 77-2798 shall be filed within three years from the last date prescribed
for filing the return or within one year from the date the tax was paid, or
within thirty days after the denial
of a claim for refund by the Tax Commissioner.

Laws 1967, c. 487, § 100, p. 1617;

Laws 2008, LB914, § 16;

Laws 2010, LB879, § 16.